Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Airport Zoning

183.861.
Establishment of Airport Zoning Commission — Jurisdiction over land use issues.

There is hereby created and established within the cabinet, a commission to be known as the “Kentucky Airport Zoning Commission” which, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapters 100 and 147, shall be empowered to issue orders, rules, and regulations pertaining to use of land within and around the facilities identified in subsection (2) of this section as will promote the public interest and protect and encourage the proper use of the airports and their facilities.

The commission shall have jurisdiction over land use issues around the following facilities in the Commonwealth:

All military airports;

All public-use facilities of the following types:

Airports;

Heliports; and

Seaplane bases; and

All private-use airports which have a paved runway in excess of two thousand nine hundred (2,900) feet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 52, effective March 25, 1960; 2000, ch. 80, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 112, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2019 ch. 121, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

183.862.
Commission membership — Compensation — Vote of ex officio chairman.

Such commission shall consist of six (6) members and the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet or in his absence his designated representative who shall be the ex officio chairman of such commission. The ex officio chairman of the commission shall not be entitled to vote on any commission action unless there is a tie vote at which time the ex officio chairman may cast the deciding vote. The members of such commission shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of four (4) years. The members shall serve for a term of four (4) years, and until their successors are appointed, provided however that the first two (2) members appointed shall serve for a term of two (2) years; the next two (2) for three (3) years; and the final two (2) for four (4) years. Upon the expiration of the first terms, successors shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years.

Each member shall be a person experienced in and familiar with the field of aeronautics.

Members of the commission shall receive fifty dollars ($50) for each day in actual session and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses and other reasonable expenses incident to performance of their duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 53; 1964, ch. 134, § 22; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(6); 1978, ch. 154, § 15, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 20, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

183.8621.
Commission administrator — Assignment — Qualifications — Duties.

The cabinet shall assign an employee to serve as administrator of the commission. The administrator shall be an employee of the Department of Aviation.

In addition to commission administration responsibilities, the administrator shall perform such duties as are assigned by the Department of Aviation.

The administrator shall be an individual familiar with aeronautics and the commission policy and shall keep and be custodian of the records and airport zoning maps adopted by the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 316, § 2; 2022 ch. 218, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

183.863.
Corporate nature — Quorum.

The commission shall be a body politic and corporate with the usual corporate attributes, including, but not limited to the power to sue and be sued, contract and be contracted with and to do all things reasonable or necessary to effectively carry out the duties prescribed. It shall meet on the call of the chairman or four (4) or more members. A quorum shall consist of four (4) members.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 54, effective March 25, 1960.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Inasmuch as KRS

183.862

makes the secretary of the department of transportation (now transportation cabinet) ex officio chairman of the Kentucky airport zoning commission, the secretary and three other members of the commission are sufficient to constitute a quorum.

OAG 75-617

.

183.864.
Venue of legal actions.

The Franklin Circuit Court shall hold concurrent venue with the courts of this Commonwealth in all civil and injunctive actions instituted by the commission for the enforcement of applicable statutes, rules, regulations and orders issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 55, effective March 25, 1960.

183.865.
Commission functions.

All of the powers, provisions, and duties relating to the zoning and use of land, structures, and air space within and around military and public use airports, heliports, and sea plane bases within the state are hereby conferred upon, delegated to and vested in the commission. The commission shall also exercise all powers, provisions, and duties relating to the use of navigable air space within the state. Nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent a governmental unit from acquiring airports, airport facilities, or air navigation facilities, or from taking any action authorized by law for the elimination of any airport hazard, either alone or jointly with the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 56; 1964, ch. 134, § 23; 1966, ch. 255, § 167; 2000, ch. 80, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

183.866.
Legislative findings as to airport hazards.

It is hereby found and declared that an airport hazard endangers the lives and property of users of the airport and of occupants of land in the vicinity, and in effect reduces the size of the area available for landing, taking off and maneuvering of aircraft, thus tending to destroy or impair the utility of the airport and the public investment therein, and therefore such hazards are not in the interest of the public health, public safety or general welfare. It is further found that any obstructions to the use of navigable air space destroy and impair the safe use of such air space thereby endangering aircraft and are not in the interest of public health, public safety or general welfare.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 57, effective March 25, 1960.

183.867.
Zoning jurisdiction — Regulations — Public files.

The commission shall require that every military and public use airport, heliport, and sea plane base in the state file with it, from time to time, as required, maps showing the airport and area surrounding the airport used for approach or landing purposes. The commission shall thereafter designate on the maps, by reference to the regulations or standards promulgated by the Federal Aviation Administration concerning the area required for the safe maneuvering approach and landing of aircraft, the area over which jurisdiction will be assumed for zoning purposes. The commission shall notify any local zoning bodies of the area so designated and may exercise jurisdiction of the area insofar as it pertains to the safe and proper maneuvering of aircraft and the safe and proper use of the airport involved. The local zoning body may retain jurisdiction of zoning in such areas as to all other matters.

The commission may adopt regulations pertaining to the zoning of areas over which jurisdiction is assumed as will provide for the proper and safe use of the area and airport.

The commission shall maintain a public file in the offices of the cabinet showing maps of each military and public use airport, heliport, and sea plane base within the state and the area around the airport over which it has assumed jurisdiction for zoning purposes and such shall constitute public notice of the restrictions and zoning applicable to the areas or airport. The commission shall also maintain a public file showing any regulations adopted pertaining to land uses in areas zoned and these regulations shall constitute public notice of same.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 58; 1964, ch. 134, § 24; 1976, ch. 308, § 6; 2000, ch. 80, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

183.868.
Factors to be considered in zoning.

In addition to considering the regulations or standards promulgated by the Federal Aviation Administration in zoning the use of land and structures in areas over which jurisdiction is assumed, the commission shall consider among other things the safety of airport users and surface persons and property, the character of flying operations conducted at the airport, the nature of the terrain, the height of existing structures and trees above the level of the airport, the views of officials of the Federal Aviation Administration as to the safe approaches required for operations at the airport, the future development of the airport including extensions to runways that may be required, the density of dwellings that may safely be permitted in the area, protection of the public investment in the airport and its facilities, the interest of the public in developing a sound public air transportation system within the state and the views and opinions of those owning land in such area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 59; 1976, ch. 308, § 7.

183.869.
Variance permits.

When the commission has assumed zoning jurisdiction over an airport and surrounding area by appropriate regulation and the filing of a map with the zoning boundaries marked thereon, no person shall thereafter change, modify or alter the use of any land or structures within such area for a purpose inconsistent with the applicable zoning regulations established by the commission except upon application to the commission for a special permit to do so. The commission shall, before issuing any such permit, give consideration to the standards set out in the preceding section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 60, effective March 25, 1960.

183.8691.
Permit application fees.

The commission shall have authority to establish by regulation reasonable application fees for the issuance of permits.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 316, § 1.

183.870.
Maximum building height regulation.

The commission shall establish by regulation the maximum height to which any structure may be erected within the navigable air space of the state. In establishing such maximum heights, the commission shall consider, among other things, the regulations or standards promulgated by the Federal Aviation Administration, the terrain involved, the location of the structure in relation to airports, the safety of aircraft, the safety of surface persons and structures, the future development of the area involved, the density of population and dwelling within the area involved, the interest of the public in developing a sound public air transportation system within the state and the interest of the person desiring to erect such structure, except that upon application to the commission, special permission may be granted to exceed such heights. The commission shall, before issuing any such permit, give consideration to the standards set out herein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 61; 1970, ch. 247, § 1; 1976, ch. 308, § 8; 1978, ch. 285, § 3, effective June 17, 1978.

183.871.
Commission hearings.

Any person may petition the commission for a hearing regarding any orders issued, and upon receipt of a petition, the commission shall convene and hear the matter in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. It shall thereafter vote on the matter, and issue its final order based on the decision of the majority of the members present. Appeals from final orders of the commission may thereafter be prosecuted under the procedure set out in KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 62, effective March 25, 1960; 1996, ch. 174, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 68, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). This section was amended by 1996 Ky. Acts chs. 174 and 318 which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 318, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

183.872.
Acquisition of property rights.

In any case in which it is desired to remove, lower or otherwise terminate a nonconforming use; or the approach protection necessary cannot, because of unconstitutional limitations, be provided by zoning regulations; or it appears advisable that the necessary approach protection be provided by acquisition of property rights rather than by zoning regulations, the cabinet, commission, air board or boards, or governmental unit may acquire by purchase, grant, condemnation or otherwise, such air right, easement, or other estate or interest in the property or nonconforming use in question as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 63, effective March 25, 1960.

183.873.
Injunction against zoning violation.

In addition to any other penalty prescribed in this chapter, the commission may institute in any court of competent jurisdiction, an action to prevent, restrain, correct or abate any violation of this chapter or of any zoning regulations adopted, or of any order or ruling made in connection with their administration or enforcement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 64, effective March 25, 1960.